Missouri, session 2026, HB2535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 149.011, 149.015, and 149.160, RSMo, are repealed and five new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.1077, 144.1420, 149.011,
149.015, and 149.160, to read as follows:
137.1077. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Veterans and
Gold Star Family Property Tax Relief Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri veterans' commission;
(2) "Disability rating", the percentage of disability assigned to a disabled
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, reflecting the degree to
which the veteran's disability impacts his or her ability to work and perform daily
activities;
(3) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who has served on active duty as a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States, has a service-connected disability and
has received a disability rating of at least thirty percent as certified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, and is an owner of record and liable for the payment of
property taxes on the qualified residence for which the exemption allowed under this
section is claimed;
(4) "Gold Star spouse", the surviving spouse of a veteran who is certified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and
indemnity compensation under federal law;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2535 2
(5) "Homestead", the real property actually owned and occupied by an
individual as his or her primary residence, and not to exceed five acres of land
surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home;
(6) "Purple Heart recipient", any individual who has been awarded the Purple
Heart medal for wounds received in action against an enemy of the United States;
(7) "Qualified residence", real property used as a homestead by a disabled
veteran, Purple Heart recipient, or Gold Star spouse, but less any portion of that
property that is used for commercial purposes. If the property, or a portion of the
property, is rented out to another person for more than six months, it is presumed to be
used for commercial purposes. No more than one property per claimant per tax year
may be claimed as a qualified residence under this section.
3. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, an annual exemption is granted from the property taxes levied on
the qualified residence of a disabled veteran, Purple Heart recipient, or Gold Star
spouse, limited to the amounts set forth as follows:
(1) For disabled veterans who are Purple Heart recipients, the annual exemption
shall be up to five thousand dollars or the total amount of the property tax levied on the
qualified residence, whichever is less; and
(2) For disabled veterans with a disability rating of seventy percent or more or
Gold Star spouses, the annual exemption is equal to one hundred percent of the
property tax levied on the qualified residence.
4. The exemption under this section carries over to the benefit of the disabled
veteran's or Purple Heart recipient's surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the
legal or beneficial title to the qualified residence and permanently resides therein. The
exemption for a surviving spouse shall remain proportional to the disabled veteran's
disability rating as of the time of the veteran's passing, except that if the surviving
spouse remarries, the exemption shall be reduced by fifty percent effective beginning in
the tax year in which the surviving spouse remarries. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply to a Gold Star spouse.
5. The exemption and determination of eligibility under this section applies for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. The claim for an exemption shall not
be transferred or assigned, except as provided for under this section.
6. In order to verify eligibility for the exemption allowed under this section, no
later than April first of each tax year for which an exemption is claimed, a disabled
veteran, Purple Heart recipient, Gold Star spouse, or surviving spouse shall:

HCS HB 2535 3
(1) Pay all local property taxes as required;
(2) Submit an application for an exemption on a form provided to the
commission and any other documentation or materials required by the commission;
(3) Include documentation that verifies proof of the disability rating, including
official documentation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(4) Include proof of ownership and occupation of the primary residence.
7. The commission shall review applications and determine eligibility of the
residential property based on the criteria set forth under this section and by the
application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. The
determination shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the
commission and any additional rules or regulations promulgated by the commission.
8. The commission may adopt reasonable procedures and promulgate
ordinances, rules, and regulations in order to implement and administer the
provisions of this section.
9. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Veterans Property Tax
Relief Fund", which shall consist of any gifts, bequests, grants, public or private
donations, transfers, moneys collected under subsection 9 of section 149.015, or funds
appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the
fund and, in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, shall approve disbursements of
public moneys in accordance with distribution requirements and procedures developed
by the commission as outlined by this section. The fund shall be a dedicated fund, and
upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided under this
section.
(2) Subject to appropriation, the commission shall use the moneys in the fund
solely to provide for full or partial exemptions, as provided under this section, to
reimburse disabled veterans, Purple Heart recipients, Gold Star spouses, and surviving
spouses for verified property tax revenue paid up to the amount of an exemption
granted under this section. The commission may retain an amount not to exceed one
and one-half percent to offset the costs of administration of the provisions of this section.
(3) No exemption reimbursement payments shall be granted from the fund
before January 1, 2028.
(4) Exemption reimbursements shall be paid on a rolling first-come, first-served
basis among all qualified eligible taxpayers, subject to full verification and compliance
with the provisions of this section. If the amount of exemptions claimed in a tax year
exceeds the moneys in the fund, the commission may determine the rules and
procedures for payment of exemption reimbursements on a pro rata basis, holding
payments until sufficient funds have accumulated in the fund and have been

HCS HB 2535 4
appropriated to the commission for payment, suspension of applications and grants of
exemptions until sufficient funds have accumulated, and payment of unpaid claims in
chronological order. Any exemption reimbursement under this section that cannot be
paid due to a lack of funds appropriated for payment shall not constitute a claim against
the state.
(5) The commission shall submit an annual report on or before December thirty-
first of each year to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the
president pro tempore of the senate summarizing the exemptions granted,
100 disbursements, and the number of veterans assisted.
101 (6) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
102 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
103 general revenue fund.
104 (7) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
105 other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
106 credited to the fund.
107 10. The exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of
108 setting the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of
109 Missouri and section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
110 11. The commission is authorized to coordinate with or negotiate a
111 memorandum of understanding with the state tax commission in order to effectuate
112 the provisions of this section and may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
113 the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
114 in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
115 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
116 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
117 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
118 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
119 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
120 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
121 12. No rule promulgated by the commission shall in any way adversely impact,
122 interrupt, or interfere with the performance of the required statutory duties of any
123 elected county official when performing such duties as deemed necessary for the
124 purposes of this section and the distribution of all other real and personal property
125 taxes.
126 13. This section shall not be subject to the provisions of the Missouri sunset act
127 under sections 23.250 to 23.298.

HCS HB 2535 5
144.1420. 1. As used in this section, the term "hemp-derived consumable
product" shall mean any product intended for human consumption, ingestion,
absorption, inhalation, or topical administration that is manufactured from hemp or
hemp extract and contains cannabinoids including, but not limited to, delta-8
tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol,
hexahydrocannabinol (HHC), tetrahydrocannabiphoral (THCP), or any other
intoxicating cannabinoid or isomer, regardless of whether the product meets the
federal definition of hemp. The term shall include consumable hemp products in the
form of beverages, shots, drink mixes, edibles, tinctures, oils, vapes, inhalation products,
or other ingestible or inhalable forms but shall not include industrial hemp fiber, seed,
textiles, animal bedding, hempcrete, rope, nonconsumable hemp products, or any
product regulated as a drug by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a tax is levied and
imposed upon the first sale of hemp-derived consumable products within this state at a
rate of ten percent of the manufacturer's or distributor's invoice price and shall be in
addition to any tax imposed under any other provision of federal, state, or local law.
3. The tax imposed under this section shall be reported and remitted monthly by
the person making the first sale within this state. The department of revenue shall
administer and enforce this section in the same manner as tobacco and vapor product
taxes under chapter 149.
4. All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury
to the credit of the veterans property tax relief fund created under section 137.1077.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, hemp-derived
consumable products shall not be considered marijuana for the purposes of taxation
under Article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri, and such products shall be subject to
the excise tax imposed under this section.
6. The department of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
149.011. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following
terms mean:

HCS HB 2535 6
(1) "Alternative nicotine product", the same meaning as such term is defined
under section 407.925;
(2) "Cigar", any roll for smoking, except cigarettes, made chiefly of tobacco or any
substitute therefor;
[(2)] (3) "Cigarette", an item manufactured of tobacco or any substitute therefor,
wrapped in paper or any substitute therefor, weighing not to exceed three pounds per one
thousand cigarettes and which is commonly classified, labeled or advertised as a cigarette;
[(3)] (4) "Common carrier", any person, association, company, or corporation
engaged in the business of operating, for public use, an agency for the transportation of
persons or property within the state;
[(4)] (5) "Director", the director of Missouri department of revenue;
[(5)] (6) "First sale within the state", the first sale of a tobacco product by a
manufacturer, wholesaler or other person to a person who intends to sell such tobacco
products at retail or to a person at retail within the state of Missouri;
[(6)] (7) "Manufacturer", any person engaged in the manufacture or production of
cigarettes;
[(7)] (8) "Manufacturer's invoice price", the original net invoice price for which a
manufacturer sells a tobacco product to a distributor, wholesaler or first seller in the state as
shown by the manufacturer's original invoice;
[(8)] (9) "Meter machine", a type of device manufactured for the use of printing or
imprinting an inked impression indicating that the cigarette tax has been paid on an individual
package of cigarettes;
[(9)] (10) "Package of cigarettes", a container of any type composition in which is
normally contained twenty individual cigarettes, except as in special instances when the
number may be more or less than twenty;
[(10)] (11) "Person", any individual, corporation, firm, partnership, incorporated or
unincorporated association, or any other legal or commercial entity;
[(11)] (12) "Retailer", any person who sells to a consumer or to any person for any
purpose other than resale;
[(12)] (13) "Sale" in this instance is defined to be and declared to include sales,
barters, exchanges and every other manner, method and form of transferring the ownership of
personal property from one person to another. "Sale" also means the possession of cigarettes
or tobacco products by any person other than a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer and shall
be prima facie evidence of possession for consumption;
[(13)] (14) "Smokeless tobacco", chewing tobacco, including, but not limited to,
twist, moist plug, loose leaf and firm plug, and all types of snuff, including, but not limited to,
moist and dry;

HCS HB 2535 7
[(14)] (15) "Stamped cigarettes", an individual package, containing twenty individual
cigarettes, more or less, on which appears or is affixed or imprinted thereon a Missouri state
cigarette tax stamp or Missouri state meter machine impression;
[(15)] (16) "Tax stamp", an item manufactured of a paper product or substitute thereof
on which is printed, imprinted, or engraved lettering, numerals or symbols indicating that the
cigarette tax has been paid on each individual package of cigarettes;
(17) "Tobacco paraphernalia", any equipment, product, or material of any kind
that is intended or designed for use in consuming, inhaling, or otherwise introducing
tobacco or a tobacco product into the human body including, but not limited to, pipes,
water pipes, hookahs, rolling papers, blunt wraps, cigar rollers, cigar cutters, cigarette
rolling machines, and any device or accessory designed for use in the combustion,
vaporization, or consumption of tobacco or a tobacco product, but shall not include
matches, lighters, or any product that is itself defined as a tobacco product under this
chapter;
[(16)] (18) "Tobacco product", cigarettes, cigarette papers, clove cigarettes, cigars,
smokeless tobacco, smoking tobacco, or other form of tobacco products or products made
with tobacco substitute containing nicotine. The term "tobacco product" shall include
alternative nicotine products and vapor products for the purposes of taxation, licensing,
enforcement, and regulatory authority under this chapter;
[(17)] (19) "Unstamped cigarettes", an individual package containing cigarettes on
which does not appear a Missouri state cigarette tax stamp or Missouri state meter machine
impression;
(20) "Vapor product", the same meaning as such term is defined under section
407.925;
[(18)] (21) "Wholesaler", any person, firm or corporation organized and existing, or
doing business, primarily to sell cigarettes or tobacco products to, and render service to,
retailers in the territory the person, firm or corporation chooses to serve; that purchases
cigarettes or tobacco products directly from the manufacturer; that carries at all times at [his
or its] the person's, firm's, or corporation's principal place of business a representative
stock of cigarettes or tobacco products for sale; and that comes into the possession of
cigarettes or tobacco products for the purpose of selling them to retailers or to persons outside
or within the state who might resell or retail the cigarettes or tobacco products to consumers.
This shall include any manufacturer, jobber, broker, agent or other person, whether or not
enumerated in this chapter, who so sells or so distributes cigarettes or tobacco products.
149.015. 1. Except as provided in subsection 9 of this section, a tax shall be levied
upon the sale of cigarettes at an amount equal to eight and one-half mills per cigarette, until
such time as the general assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the

HCS HB 2535 8
net federal reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, then the tax shall be six
and one-half mills per cigarette beginning July first of the fiscal year immediately after such
appropriation. As used in this section, "net federal reimbursement allowance" shall mean that
amount of the federal reimbursement allowance in excess of the amount of state matching
funds necessary for the state to make payments required by subsection 1 of section 208.471
or, if the payments exceed the amount so required, the actual payments made for the purposes
specified in subsection 1 of section 208.471.
2. The tax shall be evidenced by stamps which shall be furnished by and purchased
from the director or by an impression of the tax by the use of a metering machine when
authorized by the director as provided in this chapter, and the stamps or impression shall be
securely affixed to one end of each package in which cigarettes are contained. All cigarettes
must be stamped before being sold in this state.
3. Cigarette tax stamps shall be purchased only from the director. All stamps shall be
purchased by the director in proper denominations, shall contain such appropriate wording as
the director may prescribe, and shall be of such design, character, color combinations, color
changes, sizes and material as the director may, by rules and regulations, determine to afford
the greatest security to the state. It shall be the duty of the director to manufacture or contract
for revenue stamps required by this chapter; provided that if the stamps are contracted for, the
manufacturer thereof shall be within the jurisdiction of the criminal and civil courts of this
state, unless the stamps cannot be obtained in this state at a fair price or of acceptable quality.
If stamps are manufactured outside of the state, the director shall take any precautions which
he deems necessary to safeguard the state against forgery and misdelivery of any stamps. The
director may require of the manufacturer from whom stamps are purchased a bond in an
amount to be determined by him commensurate with the monetary value of the stamps,
containing such conditions as he may deem necessary in order to protect the state against loss.
4. It shall be the intent of this chapter that the impact of the tax levied hereunder be
absorbed by the consumer or user and when the tax is paid by any other person, the payment
shall be considered as an advance payment and shall thereafter be added to the price of the
cigarettes and recovered from the ultimate consumer or user with the person first selling the
cigarettes acting as an agent of the state for the payment and collection of the tax to the state,
except that in furtherance of the intent of this chapter no refund of any tax collected and
remitted by a retailer upon gross receipts from a sale of cigarettes subject to tax pursuant to
this chapter shall be claimed pursuant to chapter 144 for any amount illegally or erroneously
overcharged or overcollected as a result of imposition of sales tax by the retailer upon
amounts representing the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter and any such tax shall either be
refunded to the person who paid such tax or paid to the director. The director may recoup

HCS HB 2535 9
from any retailer any tax illegally or erroneously overcharged or overcollected unless such tax
has been refunded to the person who paid such tax.
5. In making sales of cigarettes in the state, a wholesaler shall keep a record of the
amount of tax on his gross sales. The tax shall be evidenced by appropriate stamps attached
to each package of cigarettes sold. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no tax
stamp need be attached to a package of cigarettes transported in the state between wholesalers
or distributors unless and until such package is sold to a retailer or consumer.
6. The tax on any cigarettes contained in packages of four, ten, twenty or similar
quantities to be used solely for distribution as samples shall be computed on a per cigarette
basis at the rate set forth in this section, and payment of the tax shall be remitted to the
director at such time and in such manner as he may prescribe.
7. The revenue generated by the additional two mills tax imposed effective August
13, 1982, less any three percent reduction allowed pursuant to the provisions of section
149.021, shall be placed in a separate fund entitled "The Fair Share Fund". Such moneys in
the fair share fund shall be transferred monthly to the state school moneys fund and
distributed to the school districts in this state as provided in section 163.031.
8. The revenue generated by the additional two mills tax imposed effective October 1,
1993, less any three percent reduction allowed pursuant to the provisions of section 149.021,
shall be deposited in the health initiatives fund created in section 191.831. When the general
assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the net federal
reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, this subsection shall expire. The
additional two mills tax levied pursuant to this section shall not apply to an amount of
stamped cigarettes in the possession of licensed wholesalers on October 1, 1993, up to thirty-
five percent of the total cigarette sales made by such licensed wholesaler during the six
months immediately preceding October 1, 1993.
9. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, in addition to the tax levied on the sale of
cigarettes in subsection 1 of this section, a tax shall be levied upon the sale of cigarettes
at an amount equal to five mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue generated by the additional tax imposed under this subsection,
less any three-percent reduction allowed under the provisions of section 149.021, shall
be deposited to the credit of the veterans property tax relief fund created under section
137.1077.
(3) For a period of up to six months prior to the effective date of a tax
modification under this subsection, licensees shall not be allowed to purchase stamps in
a number greater than one hundred ten percent of the number that were purchased by
such licensee during the same period in the preceding year.

HCS HB 2535 10
149.160. 1. A tax is levied upon the first sale of tobacco products, other than
cigarettes, within the state. The tax on tobacco products shall be at the rate of ten percent of
the manufacturer's invoice price before discounts and deals, and shall be paid by the person
making the first sale within the state. Licensed persons making first sales within the state
shall be allowed approved credit for returned merchandise provided the tax was paid on the
returned merchandise and the purchaser was given a refund or credit. Such licensed person
shall take such approved credit on the return for the month in which the purchaser was given
the refund or credit.
2. The tax shall not apply to tobacco products when the first sale within the state has
occurred on such tobacco products prior to October 1, 1993.
3. Amounts generated by the tax levied in this section shall be deposited in the health
initiatives fund created by section 191.831.
4. When the general assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of
the net federal reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, this section shall
expire. As used in this section, "net federal reimbursement allowance" shall mean that
amount of the federal reimbursement allowance in excess of the amount of state matching
funds necessary for the state to make payments required by subsection 1 of section 208.471
or, if the payments exceed the amount so required, the actual payments made for the purposes
specified in subsection 1 of section 208.471.
5. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, in addition to all other taxes imposed under
this chapter, a tax is hereby levied upon the first sale of vapor products, alternative
nicotine products, and tobacco paraphernalia within this state at a rate of ten percent of
the manufacturer's or distributor's invoice price before discounts and deals. The tax
imposed under this subsection shall be reported and remitted in the same manner as
taxes imposed under this section.
(2) All moneys collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the veterans property tax relief fund created under section
137.1077.
6. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, in addition to the tax imposed under
subsection 1 of this section, a tax is hereby levied upon the first sale of tobacco products,
other than cigarettes, within this state an additional tax at a rate of two percent of the
manufacturer's or distributor's invoice price before discounts and deals. The additional
tax imposed under this subsection shall be reported and remitted in the same manner as
the tax imposed under subsection 1 of this section.

HCS HB 2535 11
(2) All moneys collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the veterans property tax relief fund created under section
137.1077.
✔